Utah statutes.
40-8-10.   Notice.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any notification required by
this chapter shall be:
(1)  given by the board or division by personal service to individuals
directly affected; and
(a)  by one publication in a daily newspaper of general circulation in Salt
Lake City, Utah; and
(b)  in all newspapers of general circulation published in the county or
counties in which the land affected is situated; and
(2)  by publication in accordance with Section 45-1-101.
